Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Market Research and Plant Design and Engineering

§ 57-11-31.
Preparation of market studies, plant specifications, cost estimates, job estimates and operating statements.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is hereby authorized and empowered to employ such a firm or firms which are experienced, competent and qualified in the field of market research, industrial research, plant design and engineering as may be necessary to accomplish the following work in the shortest time possible:

To make a broad, preliminary market study to reveal a wide range of products, both agricultural and nonagricultural, that can be manufactured in Mississippi from materials and resources available in or to Mississippi.

To make detailed market studies in connection with the favorable products revealed by the preliminary study above referred to, in order to determine with reasonable certainty those products for which a profitable and growing market exists.

Lay out, design and prepare plans and specifications of the plants, machinery, equipment and other facilities necessary to produce in profitable volume those products selected as a result of the detailed study authorized in the foregoing paragraph.

Prepare detailed cost estimates of the necessary land, buildings, machinery, equipment and other facilities and determine the amount of investment capital required to build and equip each plant.

Prepare an estimate of the number of jobs to be created by each plant designed pursuant to Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39, the wage scale of the employees and the annual payroll of each plant.

Prepare a projected operating statement of each plant, showing the anticipated profits at the end of the first, third and fifth year of operation, based on maximum operating capacity. Prepare the same information based on the assumption that the plant will operate at minimum operating capacity. Provide the same information for such percentages of maximum operating capacity as the board may deem necessary to determine with reasonable certainty the capacity at which the plant must operate in order to show a profit and to attract investment capital. The aforesaid studies shall show the normal operating capital requirements of each plant for the first five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 145, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1960).

§ 57-11-33.
Contracts and expenditures for services.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized and empowered to contract and pay for the services set out in the foregoing section, in such amount or amounts as may be necessary to attain the objectives of Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39, provided such commitments and expenditures are not to exceed the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) appropriated by the Mississippi Legislature for special market research and do not, at any time, exceed for plant design and engineering the amount or balance that may be available in a special “plant engineering revolving fund” maintained in the state treasury by an initial appropriation by the Mississippi Legislature in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 145, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1960).

§ 57-11-35.
Offering of plant designs, etc., to individuals or groups; repayment of plant engineering costs by users of designs, etc.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized and empowered to offer the market research information and such plant designs, blueprints, estimates of operation and other information obtained as the result of the surveys and studies authorized by Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39 to any individual or group of individuals in Mississippi, including any governmental subdivision thereof. However, the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall inform such individuals or group of individuals desiring to make use of such plans, specifications and other information that the cost of the actual design, engineering and other work connected with each proposed plant, but not the cost of the special market research, has come from a revolving fund established by the Mississippi Legislature under Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39, and that the cost of such plant engineering services must be included by such individuals or group of individuals in the total cost of the new plant and the amount repaid to the state treasurer, to be placed in the said revolving fund, and thereby made available to pay for the cost of additional engineering and other services in connection with the design of plants for the use by other individuals. The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, after having investigated and confirmed the financial responsibility of the applicant, shall require each individual or group of individuals building a plant by the plans and specifications so provided to enter into a valid, legal and binding obligation to repay the cost of such plant engineering to the “plant engineering revolving fund” maintained in the state treasury, in an amount each year and over a period of years to be fixed by the said board in its discretion. If the individual or group of individuals building a plant by the plans and specifications so provided shall enter into a contract with any municipality for the construction of a plant from the proceeds of bonds to be issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, known as the “Balance Agriculture With Industry Law,” then the cost of such plant engineering shall be included as a part of the initial cost of the building and shall be repaid to the state treasurer from the proceeds of the sale of said bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 145, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1960).

§ 57-11-37.
Plant engineering revolving fund.

The term “revolving fund” means a “plant engineering revolving fund” maintained in the state treasury as a separate fund which can be expended by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board for costs incurred in connection with the design engineering and projected operating estimates of the proposed industrial plants so long as there is a balance in the fund provided by the Mississippi Legislature. All moneys repaid by individuals or groups of individuals in return payment for such plant engineering will be credited to the “plant engineering revolving fund” so that additional studies can be made on the same basis and under the same conditions as provided in Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 145, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1960).

§ 57-11-39.
Transfer of funds on termination of program.

If the program provided by Sections 57-11-31 through 57-11-39 is terminated or discontinued for any reason in the future, all moneys in the “plant engineering revolving fund,” after the payment by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board of any outstanding costs in connection with said plant engineering, shall be transferred to the general fund of the state treasury on written certification of the director of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board that this program has been so discontinued or terminated, citing the statutory authority therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 145, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1960).